l10n/fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.dic
Accra/L'D'Q'
Achgabat/L'D'Q'
Aïd-el-Kébir/L'
Aimé/L'D'Q'
Aix-les-Bains/L'D'Q'
Alexa/L'D'Q'
Alexane/L'D'Q'
Alia/L'D'Q'
Amandine/L'D'Q'
Ambérieu-en-Bugey/L'D'Q'
Amira/L'D'Q'
Andrésy/L'D'Q'
Annabelle/L'D'Q'
Anton/L'D'Q'
Antwerpen/L'D'Q'
Arduino/L'D'Q'
Arjuna/L'D'Q'
Athanase/L'D'Q'
Atropos/L'D'Q'
Ave/L'D'Q'
Avignon/L'D'Q'
Edison/L'D'Q'
Edwige/L'D'Q'
Émile/L'D'Q'
Emmett/L'D'Q'
Erpe-Mere/L'D'Q'
Ésope/L'D'Q'
Eurydice/L'D'Q'
Habacuc/L'D'Q'
Harold/L'D'Q'
Heather/L'D'Q'
Hérouville-Saint-Clair/L'D'Q'
Horus/L'D'Q'
IFSTTAR/L'D'Q'
IRM/L'D'Q'
Indre/L'D'
Ithaqua/L'D'Q'
Ivanhoé/L'D'Q'
OPA/L'D'Q'
Othe/L'D'
Owen/L'D'Q'
ULM/L'D'Q'
à/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
aboteau/X*
accessoiriste/S*
acinus/I*
actiniaire/S*
adagio/L'D'Q'
addendum/I*
adjudant-chef/L'D'Q'
adjudants-chefs/D'Q'
afin/Q'Q*
agromatériau/X*
agro-ressource/S*
aisseau/X*
allume-feu/X*
alors/D'Q'Qj
ambigüité/S*
ampélopsis/L'D'Q'
amphioxus/L'D'Q'
anguillule/S*
animal/X*
anti-incendie/L'D'Q'
antijeu/X*
antiseptique/S*
antislash/A*
antiviral/X*
apparatchik/L'D'Q'
appointements/D'Q'
après/L'D'Q'Qj
arbrisseau/X*
arceau/X*
aréologie/S*
arioso/I*
arrière-vassal/X*
asseau/X*
assez/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
atoca/S*
attaché-case/L'D'Q'
au/L'D'Q'QjQ*
au-dedans/Q'
aujourd'hui/D'Q'Qj
auprès/D'Q'Qj
aux/Q'QjQ*
avelinier/S*
axiomatiquement/L'D'Q'
bigorne/S.
bihoreau/X.
bitumineuse/W.
bivaluée/F.
boss/A.
boutefeu/X.
brelle/S.
bull-finch/A.
cahoteuse/W.
calculatrice/F.
cameraman/A.
captatoire/S.
carbonaro/I.
carneau/X.
cauchemardeuse/W.
cent/S=
chartrier/S.
chauffe-eau/X.
cheminote/F.
chloreuse/W.
clergyman/A.
cobaltifère/S.
coccus/I.
compacteuse/F.
comtale/W.
condottiere/I.
conoyau/X.
contre-courant/S.
cordée/F.
corticospinale/W.
courlieu/X.
croquembouche/S.
cross-country/A.
culturale/W.
curriculum/I.
décathlonienne/F.
définissable/S.
désoxydante/F.
dévitalisation/S.
diaconale/W.
dindonneau/X.
ducale/W.
duffle-coat/S.
eau/X*
écriteau/X*
ecstasy/A*
effilochement/S*
éfourceau/X*
elle/D'Q'Q*
elles/D'Q'Q*
élogieusement/D'Q'
émail/X*
émeraude/L'D'Q'
empoisonnement/S*
emporium/I*
en/Q'Q*Qjn'd'j'l'm't's'c'
enfaîteau/X*
entre/D'Q'Qj
entreprenaute/S*
épieu/X*
erseau/X*
escarpe/S*
essieu/X*
étrangement/D'Q'
évangéliquement/D'Q'
éventration/S*
exemplum/I*
factuelle/F.
fermail/X.
ferry/A.
fibromateuse/W.
flore/S.
fontanili/S=
foramen/I.
franchisée/F.
fromental/X.
ftp/S=
garden-party/A.
garrotage/S.
gesticulée/F.
glaceuse/W.
gratte/S.
grau/X.
hélico/S*
hemigrammus/L'D'Q'
hippy/A.
hirondeau/X*
homodiégétique/S*
horriblement/D'Q'
hottereau/X.
http/S=
humblement/D'Q'
hurleuse/F.
hypnothérapie/S*
ice-shelf/A*
ici/D'Q'Qj
il/D'Q'Q*QjSi
ils/D'Q'Q*Si
impedimentum/I*
impluvium/S*
impresario/I*
incessamment/D'Q'
incommensurablement/D'Q'
inespérance/S*
in-octavo/L'D'Q'
in-quarto/L'D'Q'
interférométrique/S*
isoptère/S*
jet-society/A.
juin/S.
labiodentale/W.
latifundium/I.
lavatory/A.
libretto/I.
lieu/X.
livreuse/F.
mafioso/I.
mail-coach/A.
maléficieuse/W.
malocclusion/S.
marteau/X.
math/S=
matifiante/F.
memorandum/I.
minérale/W.
miss/A.
monoplégie/S.
morceau/X.
mouleuse/F.
néorurale/W.
nous-même/S=
nullarde/F.
nuraghe/I.
obus/L'D'Q'
octante-huit/L'D'Q'
oculus/I*
off/L'D'Q'
official/X*
ombudsman/A*
on/L'D'Q'Q*
onomatopée/S*
oppidum/I*
optimum/I*
orignal/X*
où/D'Q'Qj
oublie/S*
outre-mer/L'D'
ouvreau/X*
palazzo/I.
panerée/S.
panonceau/X.
partita/I.
patriarcale/W.
penalty/A.
permienne/F.
phylum/I.
pifferaro/I.
pinocytose/S.
pipeau/X.
pizzicato/I.
poissonneuse/W.
policeman/A.
porchère/F.
porte-couteau/X.
prosociale/W.
protochrétienne/F.
protoptère/S.
pupazzo/I.
quantum/I.
quasi-cristal/X.
quatre-vingt/S=
rave-party/A.
recombinante/F.
remix/A.
reparution/S.
réseau/X.
révolue/F.
rostrale/W.
sanatorium/I.
scotch/A.
scoute/F.
scriptorium/I.
scrogneugneu/X.
semi-liberté/S.
sherry/A.
shogunale/W.
solo/I.
sous-maitresse/F.
speakeasy/A.
stimulus/I.
subnormale/W.
sucrase/S.
sulky/A.
surtravail/X.
taxum/I.
t'elle/S=
tennisman/A.
t'il/S=
toilerie/S.
tourbeuse/W.
tourteau/X.
transcutanée/F.
trullo/I.
ultimement/D'Q'
un/D'Q'Q*
une/D'Q'Q*
vésicale/W.
vingt/S=
virolage/S.
vous-même/S=
wallaby/A.
xénocristal/X.
y/Q'Q*n'd'j'l'm't's'
yeoman/A.
